Utah statutes.
32B-2-302.   Exempt from Division of Finance -- Application of procurement -- External audits.

(1) (a)  The laws that govern the Division of Finance are not applicable to the department in the purchase and sale of an alcoholic product.

(b)  The department is exempt from Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, for the purchase of an alcoholic product.  The department is subject to Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, for any purchase other than for an alcoholic product.

(2)  The state auditor shall:

(a)  select a private person to perform a financial audit of the department's accounts, subject to the commission approving the private person selected to perform the financial audit;

(b)  notify the governor of the private person selected to perform the financial audit; and

(c)  determine the scope and focus of the financial audit in an open meeting of the commission before the audit commences.

(3)  Every two years, beginning for fiscal year 2013-14, the state auditor shall conduct an audit of the department's:

(a)  management operations, best practices, and efficiency; and

(b)  ethics and statutory compliance.

(4)  In addition to complying with Subsections (2) and (3), the state auditor may engage in an activity related to the department or commission allowed under Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 15 or Title 67, Chapter 3, Auditor.

(5)  The commission shall forward an audit report issued under Subsection (2) or (3) to the following by no later than 30 days after the day on which the audit report is made:

(a)  the governor;

(b)  the Legislative Management Committee;

(c)  the director; and

(d)  the legislative auditor general.



Amended by Chapter 365, 2012 General Session

